apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="bes/ette__vblex_noadj" c="hærta, fylle, dekorere, forgjere, fengsle">
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nocase_cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etting</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etter</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nocase_cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etting</l>       <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etter</l>       <r>ette¹<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette²<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette²<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nocase_cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etting</l>       <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etter</l>       <r>ette²<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette³<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette³<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nocase_cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etting</l>       <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etter</l>       <r>ette³<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette⁴<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette⁴<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nocase_cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>      <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etting</l>       <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>etter</l>       <r>ette⁴<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/egge__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>      <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>      <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>     <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>agt</l>     <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>     <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eggende</l>  <r>egge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egg</l>       <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egge</l>      <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egges</l>     <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egger</l>     <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egges</l>     <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>egging</l>       <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>egger</l>       <r>egge<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="besette">	 <i>bes</i><par n="bes/ette__vblex_noadj"/></e>
<e lm="grunnlegge">	 <i>grunnl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="røyklegge">	 <i>røykl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="røklegge">	 <i>røkl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="pålegge">	 <i>pål</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ødelegge">	 <i>ødel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="øydelegge">	 <i>øydel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="mørklegge">	 <i>mørkl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedlegge">	 <i>nedl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="anlegge">	 <i>anl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="belegge">	 <i>bel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forelegge">	 <i>forel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forlegge">	 <i>forl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="detaljplanlegge"> <i>detaljplanl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bandlegge">	 <i>bandl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="båndlegge">	 <i>båndl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fremlegge">	 <i>freml</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ilegge">		 <i>il</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gruslegge">	 <i>grusl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gulvlegge">	 <i>gulvl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="golvlegge">	 <i>golvl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="henlegge">	 <i>henl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="erlegge">	 <i>erl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bløytlegge">	 <i>bløytl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fargelegge">	 <par n="farg"/><i>el</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="brulegge">	 <i>brul</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="brolegge">	 <i>brol</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hellelegge">	 <i>hellel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hauglegge">	 <i>haugl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjenlegge">	 <i>gjenl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="framlegge">	 <i>framl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bilegge">	 <i>bil</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bløtlegge">	 <i>bløtl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fralegge">	 <i>fral</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastlegge">	 <i>fastl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bøtelegge">	 <i>bøtel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avgiftsbelegge">	 <i>avgiftsbel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="blottlegge">	 <i>blottl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avlegge">	 <i>avl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="beslaglegge">	 <i>beslagl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gravlegge">	 <i>gravl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fliselegge">	 <i>flisel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gebyrlegge">	 <i>gebyrl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="botlegge">	 <i>botl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flislegge">	 <i>flisl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilbakelegge">	 <i>tilbakel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skattelegge">   <i>skattel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilrettelegge">	 <i>tilrettel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skårlegge">	 <i>skårl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyggelegge">	 <i>skyggel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tørrlegge">	 <i>tørrl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="teppelegge">	 <i>teppel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skattlegge">	 <i>skattl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vektlegge">	 <i>vektl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utlegge">	 <i>utl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skumlegge">	 <i>skuml</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="underlegge">	 <i>underl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vedlegge">	 <i>vedl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tåkelegge">	 <i>tåkel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tillegge">	 <i>till</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skrinlegge">	 <i>skrinl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvangsinnlegge">	 <i>tvangsinnl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="reinnlegge">	 <i>reinnl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klarlegge">	 <i>klarl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ordlegge">	 <i>ordl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overlegge">	 <i>overl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kartlegge">	 <i>kartl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="islegge">	 <i>isl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="planlegge">	 <i>planl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="minelegge">	 <i>minel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="langtidsplanlegge">	<i>langtidsplanl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="omlegge">	 <i>oml</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="postlegge">	 <i>postl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="korslegge">	 <i>korsl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innlegge">	 <i>innl</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="taushetsbelegge"> <i>taushetsbel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rimbelegge">      <i>rimbel</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flolegge">               <i>flol</i><par n="l/egge__vblex_adj"/></e>
